District of Columbia statutes.
34-212

“Person” defined.

The word “person” when used in this subtitle means every individual, corporation, company, association, joint-stock company, association, firm, partnership, or other entity.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 974, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 201(b)(3), 47 DCR 1091
1981 Ed., § 43-206.
1973 Ed., § 43-106.
D.C. Law 13-107 rewrote this section which formerly provided: “The word ‘person’ when used in Chapters 1-10 of this title includes an individual and a firm or copartnership.”